Utah statutes.
10-8-13.   Conduits, drains, etc.

They may regulate the opening and use of streets, alleys, sidewalks, crosswalks and public grounds for the laying of gas or water mains and of conduits and pipes, and the building and repairing of sewers, tunnels, conduits and drains.

